Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 73.1 School Social Workers Quality Assessment Act

16-73.1-1.
Compilation of data — School social worker duties and responsibilities.

Accumulated data is needed to identify and assess the workload, duties, and responsibilities of school social workers. The 2009 basic education plan drafted by the department of education:

Delegates to the local education agency the ultimate responsibility for the operation of a system of education and support services that is reasonably designed and adequately resourced to achieve compliance with all aspects of the basic education plan;

Requires that the local education agency provide a supportive and nurturing school community; and

Provides adequate psychological, mental health, and social services.

The state department of education shall develop a standard measure that will identify the number of school social workers in the state, and the actual nature and scope of work and services that they provide. Specifically, it shall solicit information concerning:

Prevention and intervention services;

Counselor services assessments;

Consultation;

Parent and community liaison;

Attempts to reduce violence;

Referrals and collaboration; and

Promoting adherence to federal mandates, involvement in school activities, and training.

School departments shall ascertain and forward to the state department of education the following information:

The number of social assessments completed;

The number of family contacts;

The number of staff meetings attended;

The number of community contacts;

The number of teacher consultation contacts;

The number of functional behavioral assessments (FBAs) completed;

The number of individualized educational plan (IEP) meetings attended;

The number of individual counseling sessions; and

The number of group counseling sessions.

Every school social worker shall complete this standard measure for one complete school year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 162, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 197, § 3.

16-73.1-2.
Report.

The department of education shall gather all the information concerning the duties and responsibilities of school social workers provided to it by local school departments. It shall summarize the information in a report that shall be delivered to the chairpersons of the house of representatives health education and welfare committee and the senate committee on education in January of 2020.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 162, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 197, § 3.